Utah statutes.
63G-2-501.   State Records Committee created -- Membership -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Expenses.

(1)  There is created the State Records Committee within the Department of Administrative Services to consist of the following seven individuals:

(a)  an individual in the private sector whose profession requires him to create or manage records that if created by a governmental entity would be private or controlled;

(b)  the state auditor or the auditor's designee;

(c)  the director of the Division of State History or the director's designee;

(d)  the governor or the governor's designee;

(e)  one citizen member;

(f)  one elected official representing political subdivisions; and

(g)  one individual representing the news media.

(2)  The members specified in Subsections (1)(a), (e), (f), and (g) shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.

(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current committee members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.

(c)  Each appointed member is eligible for reappointment for one additional term.

(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(5)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

